California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(A) The total number of clients served as primary caregiver at the onset of care.

(B) The number by county of live births attended as primary caregiver.

(C) The number, by county, of cases of fetal demise, infant deaths, and maternal deaths attended as primary caregiver at the discovery of the demise or death.

(D) The number of women whose primary care was transferred to another health care practitioner during the antepartum period, and the reason for each transfer.

(E) The number, reason, and outcome for each elective hospital transfer during the intrapartum or postpartum period.

(F) The number, reason, and outcome for each urgent or emergency transport of an expectant mother in the antepartum period.

(G) The number, reason, and outcome for each urgent or emergency transport of an infant or mother during the intrapartum or immediate postpartum period.

(H) The number of planned out-of-hospital births at the onset of labor and the number of births completed in an out-of-hospital setting.

(I) The number of planned out-of-hospital births completed in an out-of-hospital setting that were any of the
 following:

(i) Twin births.

(ii) Multiple births other than twin births.

(iii) Breech births.

(iv) Vaginal births after the performance of a cesarean section.

(J) A brief description of any complications resulting in the morbidity or mortality of a mother or a neonate.

(K) Any other information prescribed by the board in regulations.

(b) The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall maintain the confidentiality of the information submitted pursuant to this
 section, and shall not permit any law enforcement or regulatory agency to inspect or have copies made of the contents of any reports submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) for any purpose, including, but not limited to, investigations for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes.

(c) The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall report to the board, by April 30, those licensees who have met the requirements of subdivision (a) for that year.

(d) The board shall send a written notice of noncompliance to each licensee who fails to meet the reporting requirement of subdivision (a). Failure to comply with subdivision (a) will result in the midwife being unable to renew their license without first submitting the requisite data to the Department of Health Care Access
 and Information for the year for which that data was missing or incomplete. The board shall not take any other action against the licensee for failure to comply with subdivision (a).

(e) The board, in consultation with the Department of Health Care Access and Information and the Midwifery Advisory Council, shall devise a coding system related to data elements that require coding in order to assist in both effective reporting and the aggregation of data pursuant to subdivision (f). The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall utilize this coding system in its processing of information collected for purposes of subdivision (f).

(f) The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall report the aggregate information collected pursuant to this section to the board
 by July 30 of each year. The board shall include this information in its annual report to the Legislature.

(g) The board, with input from the Midwifery Advisory Council, may adjust the data elements required to be reported to better coordinate with other reporting systems, including the reporting system of the Midwives Alliance of North America (MANA), while maintaining the data elements unique to California. To better
 capture data needed for the report required by this section, the concurrent use of systems, including MANA’s, by licensed midwives is encouraged.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, a violation of this section shall not be a crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 13.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2516.5.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Midwife assistant” means a person, who may be unlicensed, who performs basic administrative, clerical, and midwife technical supportive services in accordance with this chapter for a licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife, is at least 18 years of age, and has had at least the minimum amount of hours of appropriate training pursuant to standards established by the board for a medical assistant pursuant to Section 2069.
 The midwife assistant shall be issued a certificate by the training institution or instructor indicating satisfactory completion of the required training. Each employer of the midwife assistant or the midwife assistant shall retain a copy of the certificate as a record.

(2) “Midwife technical supportive services” means simple routine medical tasks and procedures that may be safely performed by a midwife assistant who has limited training and who functions under the supervision of a licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife.

(3) “Specific authorization” means a specific written order prepared by the
 supervising midwife or supervising nurse-midwife authorizing the procedures to be performed on a patient, which shall be placed in the patient’s medical record, or a standing order prepared by the supervising midwife or supervising nurse-midwife authorizing the procedures to be performed. A notation of the standing order shall be placed in the patient’s medical record.

(4) “Supervision” means the supervision of procedures authorized by this section by a licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife,
 within his or her scope of practice, who is physically present on the premises during the performance of those procedures.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a midwife assistant may do all of the following:

(1) Administer medication only by intradermal, subcutaneous, or intramuscular injections and perform skin tests and additional technical support services upon the specific authorization and supervision of a licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife. A midwife assistant may also perform all these tasks and services in a clinic licensed in accordance with subdivision
 (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code upon the specific authorization of a licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife.

(2) Perform venipuncture or skin puncture for the purposes of withdrawing blood upon specific authorization and under the supervision of a licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife, if the midwife assistant has met the educational and training requirements for medical assistants as established in Section 2070. Each employer of the assistant shall retain a copy of any related certificates as a record.

(3) Perform the following midwife technical support
 services:

(A) Administer medications orally, sublingually, topically, or rectally, or by providing a single dose to a patient for immediate self-administration, and administer oxygen at the direction of the supervising licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife. The licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife shall verify the correct medication and dosage before the midwife assistant administers medication.

(B) Assist in immediate newborn care when the licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife
 is engaged in a concurrent activity that precludes the licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife from doing so.

(C) Assist in placement of the device used for auscultation of fetal heart tones when a licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife
 is engaged in a concurrent activity that precludes the licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife from doing so.

(D) Collect by noninvasive techniques and preserve specimens for testing, including, but not limited to, urine.

(E) Assist patients to and from a patient examination room, bed, or bathroom.

(F) Assist patients in activities of daily living, such as assisting with bathing or clothing.

(G) As authorized by the licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife, provide patient information and
 instructions.

(H) Collect and record patient data, including height, weight, temperature, pulse, respiration rate, blood pressure, and basic information about the presenting and previous conditions.

(I) Perform simple laboratory and screening tests customarily performed in a medical or midwife office.

(4) Perform additional midwife technical support services under regulations and standards established by the board.

(c) (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the licensure of midwife assistants. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the administration of local anesthetic agents by a midwife assistant. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the board to adopt any regulations that violate the prohibitions on
 diagnosis or treatment in Section 2052.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing a midwife assistant to perform any clinical laboratory test or examination for which he or she is not authorized under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200).

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a midwife assistant shall not be employed for inpatient care in a licensed general acute care hospital as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   (SB 408)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2517.

A person who has been convicted of a misdemeanor violation of Section 2052, prior to the effective date of this article, shall not be barred from licensure under this article solely because of that conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2518.

(a) Licenses issued pursuant to this article shall be renewable every two years upon payment of the fee prescribed by Section 2520 and submission of documentation that the licenseholder has completed 36 hours of continuing education in areas that fall within the scope of the practice of midwifery, as specified by the board.

(b) Each license not renewed shall expire, but may be reinstated within five years from the expiration upon payment of the prescribed fee and upon submission of proof of the applicant’s qualifications as the board may require.

 (c) A licensee is exempt from the
 payment of the renewal fee required by Section 2520 and the requirement for continuing education if the licensee has applied to the board for, and been issued, a retired status license. The holder of a retired status license may not engage in the practice of midwifery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 15.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2519.

The board may suspend, revoke, or place on probation the license of a midwife for any of the following:

(a) Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Incompetence or gross negligence in carrying out the usual functions of a licensed midwife.

(2) Conviction of a violation of Section 2052, in which event, the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(3) The use of advertising that is fraudulent or misleading.

(4) Obtaining or possessing in violation of law, or prescribing, or except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, or podiatrist administering to themselves, or furnishing or administering to another, any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code or any dangerous drug as defined in Article 8 (commencing with Section 4210) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) The use of any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Article 8 (commencing with Section 4210) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or alcoholic beverages, to an extent or in a manner dangerous or injurious to themselves, any other
 person, or the public, or to the extent that this use impairs their ability to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by their license.

(6) Conviction of a criminal offense involving the prescription, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances described in paragraphs (4) and (5), or the possession of, or falsification of, a record pertaining to, the substances described in paragraph (4), in which event the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence thereof.

(7) Commitment or confinement by a court of competent jurisdiction for intemperate use of or addiction to the use of any of the substances described in paragraphs (4) and (5), in which event the court order of commitment or confinement is prima facie evidence of such
 commitment or confinement.

(8) Falsifying, or making grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in any hospital, patient, or other record pertaining to the substances described in subdivision (a).

(b) Procuring a license by fraud or misrepresentation.

(c) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a midwife, as determined by the board. 

(d) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate any provision or term of this chapter.

(e) Making or giving
 any false statement or information in connection with the application for issuance of a license.

(f) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an applicant in any examination required under this chapter for the issuance of a license or a certificate.

(g) Impersonating another licensed practitioner, or permitting or allowing another person to use their license or certificate for the purpose of providing midwifery services.

(h) Aiding or assisting, or agreeing to aid or assist any person or persons, whether a licensed physician or not, in the performance
 of, or arranging for, a violation of any of the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 2221) of Chapter 5.

(i) Failing to do any of the following when required pursuant to Section 2507:

(1) Consult with a physician and surgeon.

(2) Refer a client to a physician and surgeon.

(3) Transfer a client to a hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 5.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2519.5.

(a) Any complaint determined to involve quality of care, before referral to a field office for further investigation, shall meet both of the following criteria:

(1) It shall be reviewed by one or more medical experts with the pertinent education, training, and expertise in
 midwifery to evaluate the specific standard of care issues raised by the complaint to determine if further field investigation is required.

(2) It shall include the review of all of the following, which shall be requested by the board:

(A) Relevant client records.

(B) The statement or explanation of the care and treatment provided by the licensed midwife.

(C) Any additional expert testimony or literature provided by the licensed midwife.

(D) Any additional facts or information requested by the medical expert reviewers that may assist them in determining whether the care rendered constitutes a departure from the midwifery standards of care.

(b) If the board does not receive the information requested pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) within 10 business days of requesting that information, the complaint may be reviewed by the medical experts and referred to a field office for investigation without the information.

(c) Nothing in this section shall impede the board’s ability to seek and obtain an interim suspension order or other emergency relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   (SB 1440)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2520.

(a) (1) The fee to be paid upon the filing of a license application shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450).

(2) For licenses that expire on or after January 1, 2022, the fee for renewal of the midwife license shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

(3) The delinquency fee for renewal of the midwife license shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of the renewal of the license, but not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

(4) The fee for the examination shall be the cost of administering the examination to the
 applicant, as determined by the organization that has entered into a contract with the board for the purposes set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 2512.5. Notwithstanding subdivision (c), that fee may be collected and retained by that organization.

(b) The fee for monitoring a licensee on probation shall be the cost of monitoring, as fixed by the board.

(c) The fees prescribed by this article shall be deposited in the Licensed Midwifery Fund, which is hereby established, and shall be available, upon appropriation, to the board for the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 29.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2521.

Any person who violates this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2522.

(a) A person whose license has been voluntarily surrendered while under investigation or while charges are pending or whose license has been revoked or suspended or placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation.

(b) The person may file the petition after a period of not less than the following minimum periods have elapsed from the effective date of the surrender of the license or the decision ordering that disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a license surrendered or revoked for unprofessional conduct, except that the
 board may, for good cause shown, specify in a revocation order that a petition for reinstatement may be filed after two years.

(2) At least two years for early termination of probation of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for modification of a condition, or reinstatement of a license surrendered or revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation of less than three years.

(c) The petition shall state any facts as may be required by the board. The petition shall be accompanied by at least two verified recommendations from midwives licensed in any state who have personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed.

(d) The petition may be heard by a panel of the board. The board may
 assign the petition to an administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a proposed decision to the board, which shall be acted upon in accordance with Section 2335.

(e) The panel of the board or the administrative law judge hearing the petition may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities during the time the license was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability. The hearing may be continued from time to time as the administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code finds necessary.

(f) The administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the
 Government Code reinstating a license or modifying a penalty may recommend the imposition of any terms and conditions deemed necessary.

(g) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the person. The board may deny without a hearing or argument any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 303, Sec. 7.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2523.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the board shall revoke the license of any person who has been required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code for conduct that occurred on or after January 1, 2017.

(b) This section shall not apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code.

(c) This section shall not apply to a person who has been relieved under Section 290.5 of the Penal Code of his or her duty to register as a sex offender, or whose duty to register has
 otherwise been formally terminated under California law.

(d) A proceeding to revoke a license pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 303, Sec. 8.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 25. Recommending Medical Cannabis [2525. - 2525.5.]

2525.

(a) It is unlawful for a physician and surgeon who recommends cannabis to a patient for a medical purpose to accept, solicit, or offer any form of remuneration from or to a facility issued a state license pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000), if the physician and surgeon or his or her immediate family have a financial interest in that facility.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “financial interest” shall have the same meaning as in Section 650.01.

(c) A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by up to one year in county jail and a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by civil penalties of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall constitute
 unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   (AB 3261)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.1.

The Medical Board of California shall consult with the California Marijuana Research Program, known as the Center for Medicinal Cannabis Research, authorized pursuant to Section 11362.9 of the Health and Safety Code, on developing and adopting medical guidelines for the appropriate administration and use of medical cannabis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 719, Sec. 5.   (SB 643)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.2.

An individual who possesses a license in good standing to practice medicine or osteopathy issued by the Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall not recommend medical cannabis to a patient, unless that person is the patient’s attending physician, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 96.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.3.

Recommending medical cannabis to a patient for a medical purpose without an appropriate prior examination and a medical indication constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 719, Sec. 5.   (SB 643)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.4.

It is unprofessional conduct for any attending physician recommending medical cannabis to be employed by, or enter into any other agreement with, any person or entity dispensing medical cannabis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 719, Sec. 5.   (SB 643)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2525.5.

(a) A person shall not distribute any form of advertising for physician recommendations for medical cannabis in California unless the advertisement bears the following notice to consumers:
NOTICE TO CONSUMERS: The Compassionate Use Act of 1996 ensures that seriously ill Californians have the right to obtain and use cannabis for medical purposes where medical use is deemed appropriate and has been recommended by a physician who has determined that the person’s health would benefit from the use of medical cannabis. Recommendations must come from an attending physician as defined in Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code. Cannabis is a Schedule I drug according to the federal
 Controlled Substances Act. Activity related to cannabis use is subject to federal prosecution, regardless of the protections provided by state law.
(b) Advertising for attending physician recommendations for medical cannabis shall meet all of the requirements in Section 651. Price advertising shall not be fraudulent, deceitful, or misleading, including statements or advertisements of bait, discounts, premiums, gifts, or statements of a similar nature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 719, Sec. 5.   (SB 643)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 26. Athletic Trainers  [2529.8.1. - 2529.8.1.]

2529.8.1.

(a) A person shall not hold themselves out to be an athletic trainer, use the title “athletic trainer,” “certified athletic trainer,” “licensed athletic trainer,” “registered athletic trainer,” or any other term such as “AT,” “ATC,” “LAT,” or “CAT” to imply or suggest that the person is an athletic trainer, unless they meet the following requirements:

(1) Have done either of the following:

(A) Graduated from a college or university after completing an athletic training education program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Athletic Training Education, or its predecessors or successors.

(B) Completed eligibility requirements
 for certification by the Board of Certification for the Athletic Trainer, or its predecessors or successors.

(2) Is certified by the Board of Certification for the Athletic Trainer, or its predecessors or successors.

(b) It is an unfair business practice within the meaning of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 for a person to use the title “athletic trainer,” “certified athletic trainer,” “licensed athletic trainer,” “registered athletic trainer,” or any other term such as “AT,” “ATC,” “LAT,” or “CAT,” that implies or suggests that the person is an athletic trainer, if they do not meet the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) A person shall not hold themselves out to be an athletic trainer or use any of the titles listed under subdivisions (a) and (b) if either of the following is
 true:

(1) The person has been convicted in a court in or outside of this state of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, based on the elements of the convicted offense, would have been punishable as one or more of the offenses described in subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(2) The person has an athletic trainer license or registration in another state that was disciplined or is otherwise restricted, or if an accusation or similar document initiating disciplinary action is pending against the license or registration.

(d) A person who is currently using one of the titles listed under subdivisions (a) and (b) and is covered under a collective bargaining agreement is not subject to the requirements of this section until the parties to that bargaining agreement renew that agreement. At
 that time, a person shall not use the titles listed in subdivisions (a) and (b) if the individual does not meet the requirements of this section. Those individuals may choose a different title to describe their positions under the new collective bargaining agreement.

(e) An employee whose title is changed in order to comply with this section shall not suffer any loss of employment status as a result of the title change, including, but not limited to, layoff, demotion, termination, reclassification, or loss of pay, seniority, benefits, or any other status or compensation related to the position.

(f) This section does not apply to professional trainers licensed by the State Athletic Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 6.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.3. Speech-Language Pathologists, Audiologists, and Hearing Aid Dispensers [2530. - 2539.14.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2530. - 2530.7.]

2530.

This act may be cited as the “Speech-Language Pathologists and Audiologists and Hearing Aid Dispensers Licensure Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 2.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2530.1.

The Legislature finds and declares that the practice of speech-language pathology and audiology and hearing aid dispensing in California affects the public health, safety, and welfare and there is a necessity for those professions to be subject to regulation and control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 3.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2530.2.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Board” means the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board.

(b) “Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other organization or combination thereof, except that only individuals can be licensed under this chapter.

(c) A “speech-language pathologist” is a person who practices speech-language pathology.

(d) The practice of speech-language pathology means all of the following:

(1) The application of principles, methods, instrumental procedures, and noninstrumental procedures for measurement, testing, screening, evaluation, identification, prediction, and counseling related to the development and disorders of speech, voice, language, or swallowing.

(2) The application of principles and methods for preventing, planning, directing, conducting, and supervising programs for habilitating, rehabilitating, ameliorating, managing, or modifying disorders of speech, voice, language, or swallowing in individuals or groups of individuals.

(3) Conducting hearing screenings.

(4) Performing suctioning in connection with the scope of practice
 described in paragraphs (1) and (2), after compliance with a medical facility’s training protocols on suctioning procedures.

(e) (1) Instrumental procedures referred to in subdivision (d) are the use of rigid and flexible endoscopes to observe the pharyngeal and laryngeal areas of the throat in order to observe, collect data, and measure the parameters of communication and swallowing as well as to guide communication and swallowing assessment and therapy. Passage of these instruments without the presence of a physician and surgeon is subject to paragraph (2).

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as a diagnosis. Any observation of an abnormality shall be referred to a physician and surgeon.

(f) (1) A licensed speech-language pathologist shall not perform a flexible fiber optic transnasal endoscopic procedure unless they have received written verification from one otolaryngologist certified by the American Board of Otolaryngology – Head and Neck Surgery that the speech-language pathologist has performed a minimum of 25 supervised flexible fiber optic transnasal endoscopic procedures and they are competent to perform these procedures. Of these 25 procedures, the first 10 procedures shall be supervised by a licensed physician and surgeon who performs nasal endoscopy as part of their practice and the subsequent 15 procedures shall be supervised by either a licensed physician and surgeon who performs nasal endoscopy as part of their practice or by another licensed speech-language pathologist who is verified as competent in performing flexible fiber optic
 transnasal endoscopic procedures. The speech-language pathologist shall have this written verification on file and readily available for inspection upon request by the board. A speech-language pathologist with a verification on file shall pass a flexible fiber optic transnasal endoscopic instrument only upon the orders of a licensed physician and surgeon. The order by a physician and surgeon is deemed to allow a speech-language pathologist with verification, in accordance with this paragraph, to perform fiber optic transnasal endoscopic procedures at a location based on the patient’s medical needs that complies with procedures specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(2) A licensed speech-language pathologist who holds a written verification pursuant to this subdivision that was issued before January 1, 2023, shall be deemed to
 meet the requirements described in paragraph (1).

(g) (1) A licensed speech-language pathologist shall only perform flexible endoscopic procedures described in subdivision (e) in the following settings that requires the facility to have protocols for emergency medical backup procedures, including a physician and surgeon or other appropriate medical professionals being readily available.

(A) A clinic, as defined in Section 1200 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A facility described in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) A health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and
 Safety Code.

(D) A hospice facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 1745) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(E) A medical group practice, including a professional medical
 corporation, as defined in Section 2406, another form of corporation controlled by physicians and surgeons, a medical partnership, a medical foundation exempt from licensure, or another lawfully organized group of physicians and surgeons that provides health care services.

(2) A licensed speech-language pathologist performing flexible fiber optic transnasal endoscopic procedures on patients who have contraindications to the procedure shall consult and document clearance with the physician and surgeon that the licensed speech-language pathologist can safely perform the procedure. For purposes of this paragraph, contraindications for these procedures may include, but are not limited to, cases of bilateral obstruction of nasal passages, refractory epistaxis, cardiac disorder with acute risk of vasovagal episode and bradycardia,
 history of vasovagal episodes, facial trauma, recent trauma to the nasal cavity, or surrounding tissue and structures secondary to surgery or injury, severe bleeding disorders, severe movement disorders, severe agitation, and inability to cooperate with the examination.

(h) “Speech-language pathology aide” means any person meeting the minimum requirements established by the board, who works directly under the supervision of a speech-language pathologist.

(i) (1) “Speech-language pathology assistant” means a person who meets the academic and supervised training requirements set forth by the board and who is approved by the board to assist in the provision of speech-language pathology under the direction and supervision of a speech-language pathologist who
 shall be responsible for the extent, kind, and quality of the services provided by the speech-language pathology assistant.

(2) The supervising speech-language pathologist employed or contracted for by a public school may hold a valid and current license issued by the board, a valid, current, and professional clear clinical or rehabilitative services credential in language, speech, and hearing issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, or other credential authorizing service in language, speech, and hearing issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing that is not issued on the basis of an emergency permit or waiver of requirements. For purposes of this paragraph, a “clear” credential is a credential that is not issued pursuant to a waiver or emergency permit and is as otherwise defined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.
 Nothing in this section referring to credentialed supervising speech-language pathologists expands existing exemptions from licensing pursuant to Section 2530.5.

(j) An “audiologist” is one who practices audiology.

(k) “The practice of audiology” means the application of principles, methods, and procedures of measurement, testing, appraisal, prediction, consultation, counseling, and instruction related to auditory, vestibular, and related functions and the modification of communicative disorders involving speech, language, auditory behavior, or other aberrant behavior resulting from auditory dysfunction; and the planning, directing, conducting, supervising, or participating in programs of identification of auditory disorders, hearing conservation, cerumen removal, aural habilitation,
 and rehabilitation, including hearing aid recommendation and evaluation procedures, including, but not limited to, specifying amplification requirements and evaluation of the results thereof, auditory training, and speech reading, and the selling of hearing aids.

(l) A “dispensing audiologist” is a person who is authorized to sell hearing aids pursuant to their audiology license.

(m) “Audiology aide” means any person meeting the minimum requirements established by the board who works directly under the supervision of an audiologist. The board may by regulation exempt certain functions performed by an industrial audiology aide from supervision provided that their employer has established a set of procedures or protocols that the aide shall follow in performing these
 functions.

(n) “Medical board” means the Medical Board of California.

(o) A “hearing screening” performed by a speech-language pathologist means a binary puretone screening at a preset intensity level for the purpose of determining if the screened individuals are in need of further medical or audiological evaluation.

(p) “Cerumen removal” means the nonroutine removal of cerumen within the cartilaginous ear canal necessary for access in performance of audiological procedures that shall occur under physician and surgeon supervision. Cerumen removal, as provided by this section, shall only be performed by a licensed audiologist. Physician and surgeon supervision shall not be construed to require the physical presence of the
 physician, but shall include all of the following:

(1) Collaboration on the development of written standardized protocols. The protocols shall include a requirement that the supervised audiologist immediately refer to an appropriate physician any trauma, including skin tears, bleeding, or other pathology of the ear discovered in the process of cerumen removal as defined in this subdivision.

(2) Approval by the supervising physician of the written standardized protocol.

(3) The supervising physician shall be within the general vicinity, as provided by the physician-audiologist protocol, of the supervised audiologist and available by telephone contact at the time of cerumen removal.

(4) A licensed physician and surgeon may not simultaneously supervise more than two audiologists for purposes of cerumen removal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 3.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2530.3.
